Utah statutes.
26-21-6.   Duties of department.

(1)  The department shall:

(a)  enforce rules established pursuant to this chapter;

(b)  authorize an agent of the department to conduct inspections of health care facilities pursuant to this chapter;

(c)  collect information authorized by the committee that may be necessary to ensure that adequate health care facilities are available to the public;

(d)  collect and credit fees for licenses as free revenue;

(e)  collect and credit fees for conducting plan reviews as dedicated credits;

(f) (i)  collect and credit fees for conducting clearance under Chapter 21, Part 2, Clearance for Direct Patient Access; and

(ii)  beginning July 1, 2012:

(A)  up to $105,000 of the fees collected under Subsection (1)(f)(i) are dedicated credits; and

(B)  the fees collected for background checks under Subsection 26-21-204(6) and Section 26-21-205 shall be transferred to the Department of Public Safety to reimburse the Department of Public Safety for its costs in conducting the federal background checks;

(g)  designate an executive secretary from within the department to assist the committee in carrying out its powers and responsibilities;

(h)  establish reasonable standards for criminal background checks by public and private entities;

(i)  recognize those public and private entities that meet the standards established pursuant to Subsection (1)(h); and

(j)  provide necessary administrative and staff support to the committee.

(2)  The department may:

(a)  exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(b)  review architectural plans and specifications of proposed health care facilities or renovations of health care facilities to ensure that the plans and specifications conform to rules established by the committee; and

(c)  make rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter, except as authority is specifically delegated to the committee.



Amended by Chapter 328, 2012 General Session

